Massachusetts, session 194th, S1059.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 167 of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after definition of “Criminal justice agencies”
the following definition:-
“Criminal justice duties”, those duties described in the definition of criminal justice
agency which the specific agency is authorized by law to perform, and which an individual is
authorized by the agency to perform in their official capacity. Criminal justice duties shall also
include use of the criminal justice information system for criminal justice employment and
background checks as well as licensing where the criminal justice agency is the licensing
authority. Criminal justice duties shall not include duties for the purpose of effectuating civil
of 2

arrests or initiating, investigating, prosecuting, or otherwise pursuing civil or administrative
proceedings.
SECTION 2. Section 167A of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after clause (i) the following clause:-
(j) The department shall not disclose to any federal agency or permit any federal agency
to access any files, data, or other information from the Massachusetts registry of motor vehicles
for purposes of civil immigration enforcement, provided that information concerning a particular
identified individual may be disclosed upon receipt of a valid probable cause warrant signed by a
judge. The attorney general is authorized to bring an action in state or federal court to quash,
modify, or otherwise contest any demand for information not in accordance with the
requirements of this paragraph.
SECTION 3. Said section 172 of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, in line 161, after the word “databases” the following words:- ; provided
that criminal offender record information shall not be accessed or disclosed for any non-criminal
justice purpose, including civil enforcement duties; and further provided that the director of any
such federal agency has certified in writing subject to penalty of perjury that such database is
used solely for the performance of criminal justice duties and the department has taken
reasonable steps to confirm the accuracy of such certification to its satisfaction.
of 2